Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
General Provisions

281.710.
Nonresident carrier to have agent for service of process. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 29; 1960, ch. 139, § 14; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.715.
Free transportation for department employees. [Repealed.]

281.717.
Publicly-operated bus service to disabled persons.

All public entities operating under the provisions of any regular route bus certificate issued pursuant to this chapter shall provide service to disabled persons as required by federal regulations promulgated pursuant to the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended (Public Law 101-336).

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 91, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

281.720.
Distinguishing plates for vehicles.

Except for vehicles operating under a TNC, household goods, property, or U-Drive-It certificate, the department shall prescribe and furnish a motor carrier license plate, which shall at all times be displayed on each motor carrier vehicle authorized to be operated under a certificate. A person shall not transfer a motor carrier license plate from one (1) motor vehicle to another, except by the authority and with the consent of the department.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 31; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 232, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 2015 ch. 19, § 18, effective June 24, 2015.

281.725.
Certification of drivers and chauffeurs.
[Repealed.]

281.726.
Certification of drivers and chauffeurs — Requirements — Duties of circuit clerk — Cost of certificate — Revocation or suspension of certificate — Federal regulation. [Repealed.]

281.727.
Use of electronic title system by U-Drive-It that is an approved entity — Administrative regulations. [Effective January 1, 2024]

A U-Drive-It who becomes an approved entity as defined in KRS

186A.005

may use the electronic title application and registration system established under KRS

186A.017

to:

Apply for initial or renewal registration on vehicles in its fleet; or

Submit the appropriate fees and taxes to maintain permanent registration on vehicles in its fleet in accordance with KRS

186A.127

.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to set forth procedures for holders of U-Drive-It certificates who meet the definition of an approved entity under KRS

186A.005

to access the electronic title application and registration system for initial or renewal registration and payment of annual fees and taxes on permanent registrations.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 18, § 12, effective January 1, 2024.

281.728.
Certain certificate holders not to hold themselves out as supplying other services.

A holder of a taxicab, limousine, disabled persons vehicle, transportation network company, or U-Drive-It certificate shall not advertise or hold itself out as supplying any other services, unless the service is authorized by the carrier’s certificate and the motor carrier vehicle in question meets the definition of the particular vehicle type being advertised or offered.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the holder of a taxicab, limousine, TNC, disabled persons vehicle, or U-Drive-It certificate from operating a motor vehicle which meets the definition of more than one (1) type of motor carrier vehicle.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2015 ch. 19, § 19, effective June 24, 2015.

281.730.
Federal regulations on maximum driving and on-time-duty — Exemptions for agricultural commodities and farm supplies during planting and harvesting season.

As used in this section:

“Agricultural commodity” means any agricultural commodity, nonprocessed food, feed, fiber, or livestock;

“Farm supplies for agricultural purposes” means a product directly related to the growing or harvesting of agricultural commodities; and

“Planting and harvesting season” means the period of time that begins on January 1 and ends on December 31 of each year.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may adopt by reference or set forth in its entirety the provisions of 49 C.F.R. sec. 350.341 and pt. 395 in effect as of July 15, 1986, or as amended with respect to any motor vehicle registered in Kentucky.

The provisions of 49 C.F.R. pt. 395 adopted or set forth by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall not apply during Kentucky’s planting and harvesting season to drivers transporting:

Agricultural commodities from the source of the agricultural commodities to a location within a one hundred fifty (150) air-mile radius from the source, or within the maximum radius from the source that is permitted by federal law, whichever is greater;

Farm supplies for agricultural purposes from a wholesale or retail distribution point of the farm supplies to a farm or other location where the farm supplies are intended to be used within a one hundred fifty (150) air- mile radius from the distribution point, or within the maximum radius from the distribution point that is permitted by federal law, whichever is greater; or

Farm supplies for agricultural purposes from a wholesale distribution point of the farm supplies to a retail distribution point of the farm supplies within a one hundred fifty (150) air-mile radius from the wholesale distribution point, or within the maximum radius from the wholesale distribution point that is permitted by federal law, whichever is greater.

The provisions of this section shall be void if the Secretary of the United States Department of Transportation determines through a rulemaking proceeding that Section 345(a.)(1.) of the National Highway System Designation Act of 1995 presents a hazard to the traveling public.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 33; 1986, ch. 226, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 256, § 1, effective April 4, 1996; 2011, ch. 88, § 3, effective March 16, 2011; 2015 ch. 19, § 20, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

281.735.
Overcrowding of passenger vehicles — Maximum width.

The department shall, in its safety regulations, prescribe rules prohibiting overcrowding in the various types of motor vehicles carrying passengers for hire.

The owner or driver of any motor vehicle for the transportation of passengers shall not permit any passengers to ride upon the steps or running-board of any such motor vehicle, nor shall he permit any passenger to ride on the top of any such motor vehicle unless the top has been designed and equipped with seats constructed for such use and provided with protecting railing or protective enclosure on all four (4) sides of the top of the vehicle, and unless such use has been authorized by a certificate issued by the department.

No motor carrier shall operate a motor vehicle for the transportation of persons for hire, except buses, with an extreme width exceeding ninety-six (96) inches, except upon such highways which are a part of the state-maintained system upon which increased widths have been authorized by order of the commissioner of highways as provided by law. The extreme width of a bus shall not exceed one hundred two (102) inches.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 34; 1970, ch. 139, § 2; 2015 ch. 19, § 21, effective June 24, 2015.

281.740.
Accident reports. [Repealed.]

281.745.
Passenger vehicles required to stop at railroad crossings.

The driver of any motor vehicle used in the transportation of passengers for hire shall stop such motor vehicle before crossing at grade the main track of any railroad, except where the crossing is a guarded crossing protected by gates or a flag controlled or operated by an employee of the railroad company. The stop shall be made at not less than ten (10) feet nor more than thirty (30) feet from the nearest track to be crossed. After making the stop, the driver shall look carefully in each direction for approaching cars or trains, and shall not start his or her vehicle until he or she has ascertained that no cars or trains are approaching in each direction.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 36; 2015 ch. 19, § 22, effective June 24, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

All motor vehicles to stop at railroad crossing on signal, KRS

189.560

.

281.750.
Identification of motor vehicles.

In order that motor vehicles may be properly identified and for the purpose of preventing tax evasion, the department may, by regulations, require such vehicles to display or have painted upon the same such signs, numbers or other identification as may be reasonably necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 37.

281.751.
Registering trailers and semitrailers — Exemptions.

Trailers or semitrailers which are operated by carriers or motor carriers under the jurisdiction of this department shall be registered by the owner or operator thereof applying to the county clerk of the county in which he resides or in which such vehicle is principally operated, in accordance with KRS

186.655

; provided, however, that the provisions of this section do not apply to the following:

Trailers or semitrailers operated in interstate commerce in this state by carriers or motor carriers domiciled in a state other than this state when used in combination with power units licensed in a state other than this state, said power units being lawfully entitled to reciprocal privileges in this state under the circumstances being operated; or

Trailers or semitrailers operated in interstate commerce in this state by carriers or motor carriers domiciled in a state other than this state when used in combination with power units licensed in a state other than this state, said power units not being lawfully entitled to reciprocal privileges in this state under the circumstances being operated if said power units are at the time properly licensed in this state or are operated under a lawful exemption from the requirements of licensing in this state; or

Trailers or semitrailers operated in interstate commerce in this state on a lawful interchange basis by carriers or motor carriers domiciled in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 7; 1958, ch. 70, § 30; 1962, ch. 63, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1978, ch. 384, § 464, effective June 17, 1978.

281.752.
Fees for issuing identifying plates and papers to motor carriers.

For motor carriers defined under KRS 138.655(5) and (7) and for the purposes of tax collection, the department may charge a fee of ten dollars ($10) in each instance for the issuance of such identifying plates, decals, cards, signs, or papers, for the identification of motor vehicles, operated within the state.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 15; 1960, ch. 139, § 11; 1962, ch. 63, § 8; 1972, ch. 269, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1982, ch. 265, § 1, effective April 1, 1982; 1986, ch. 22, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2015 ch. 19, § 23, effective June 24, 2015.

281.755.
Inspection of motor vehicles.

The Department of Kentucky State Police or any other peace officer designated by the department may at any time or place make an inspection of any motor vehicle operating under the provisions of this chapter. They may enter into and upon any such motor vehicle for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not any provision of this chapter or any order or rule or regulation of the department relating to such motor vehicles has been violated. Willful refusal to stop any such motor vehicle, when ordered to do so by any representative of the Department of Kentucky State Police, or to permit the representative to enter into or upon the motor vehicle for the purpose of inspection, shall be sufficient ground for the revocation or suspension of the certificate or permit of the motor carrier.

In the event that a peace officer orders a commercial motor vehicle to be taken to a storage or impoundment facility as a result of a violation which requires the vehicle to be moved, the driver of the commercial motor vehicle shall be granted the ability to drive the commercial motor vehicle to the storage or impoundment facility. If the driver elects to drive to the storage or impoundment facility, a peace officer shall escort the vehicle to the facility. This subsection shall not apply if the commercial motor vehicle is required to be impounded as a result of a violation of KRS

281A.210

, an out-of-service order as defined in KRS 281A.010(26), or a serious traffic violation as defined in KRS 281A.010(29).

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 38; 1980, ch. 295, § 96, effective July 15, 1980; 2005, ch. 165, § 12, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 279, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 75, § 17, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 93, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 93, sec. 3, provides: “Section 2 of this Act (this statute) shall apply retroactively, but shall not be construed to permit the prosecution of a person whose vehicle was inspected by a peace officer who did not, prior to the effective date of this Act (July 15, 2010), have the authority to perform inspections under KRS Chapter 281.”

281.757.
Prohibition against operating commercial motor vehicle with inoperable, missing, or obscured lights or reflectors.

As used in this section:

“Lights” means the lighting devices required on commercial vehicles having a declared gross weight in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 393 and 49 C.F.R. Part 571; and

“Reflectors” means the reflex reflectors and retroflective sheeting required on commercial vehicles having a declared gross weight in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Part 393.

A person shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle if the lights or reflectors are inoperable, missing, or are obscured by dirt, mud, or other debris.

Law enforcement officers shall enforce violations of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 159, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2007, ch. 85, § 280, effective June 26, 2007.

281.760.
Motor carriers shall comply with city and urban-county traffic rules and regulations.

Every motor carrier operating under a certificate or permit issued by the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall observe traffic rules and regulations of each city and each urban-county while operating therein.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 39; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1974, ch. 142, § 3; 2015 ch. 19, § 24, effective June 24, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Applicability to bus of statute, ordinance or regulation requiring vehicle to be stopped or parked parallel with, and within certain distances of, curb. 17 A.L.R.2d 583.

281.763.
Holders of commercial driver’s licenses to observe traffic rules and regulations — Notice to carrier of traffic convictions of license holder.

Every holder of a commercial driver’s license, issued by Kentucky or another licensing jurisdiction, shall observe traffic rules and regulations of the Commonwealth. If a holder of a commercial driver’s license, issued by Kentucky or another licensing jurisdiction, receives a citation for a moving or nonmoving traffic violation while operating a commercial vehicle in the Commonwealth, the clerk of the court in which the holder of the commercial driver’s license was convicted shall, within fifteen (15) days of the conviction, notify the motor carrier under whose permit the holder was operating, of the citation and conviction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 246, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

281.764.
Operation of platoon of commercial motor vehicles — Administrative regulations.

A motor carrier may operate a platoon on the highways of this state if the motor carrier complies with this section.

Motor carriers wishing to operate a platoon shall provide notification to the department and the Kentucky State Police, including a plan for general platoon operations. The department shall have thirty (30) days from the date of receipt to review the notification plan submitted and determine whether it will approve or reject the plan. If the department rejects a submitted plan, it shall inform the motor carrier of the reason for the rejection and provide guidance on how to resubmit the notification and plan to meet the standards.

Only commercial motor vehicles shall be eligible to operate in a platoon.

An appropriately endorsed driver who holds a valid commercial driver’s license shall be present behind the wheel of each commercial motor vehicle in a platoon.

A commercial motor vehicle involved in a platoon shall not draw another motor vehicle in the platoon.

Each commercial motor vehicle involved in a platoon shall display a marking warning other motorists and law enforcement that the vehicle may be part of a platoon.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to set forth procedures for platooning, including required elements of a platooning plan.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

281.765.
Enforcement of motor vehicle laws — Arrests — Bail bonds. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Any peace officer, including sheriffs and their deputies, constables and their deputies, city police officers, county police or patrols, and special officers appointed by any agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for the enforcement of its laws relating to motor vehicles and boats or boating, now existing or hereafter enacted, shall be authorized and it is hereby made the duty of each of them to enforce the provisions of this chapter and to make arrests for any violation or violations thereof, and for violations of any other law relating to motor vehicles and boating, without warrant if the offense be committed in his presence, and with warrant or summons if he does not observe the commission of the offense. When in pursuit of any offender for any offense committed within his jurisdiction, any such officer may follow and effect an arrest beyond the limits of his jurisdiction. If the arrest be made without warrant, the accused may elect to be immediately taken before the nearest court having jurisdiction, whereupon it shall be the duty of the officer to so take him. If the accused elects not to be so taken, then it shall be the duty of the officer to require of the accused a bail-bond in a sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100), conditioned that the accused binds himself to appear in the court of jurisdiction at the time fixed in the bond, not however in any case later than six (6) days from the day of arrest. In case the arrested person fails to appear on the day fixed, the bond shall be forfeited in the manner as is provided for the forfeiture of bonds in other cases. No officer shall be permitted to take a cash bond. The officer making the arrest and taking the bond shall report the same to the court having jurisdiction within eighteen (18) hours after taking such bond.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 40; 1974, ch. 305, § 1; 2019 ch. 44, § 23, effective June 27, 2019.

281.765.
Enforcement of motor vehicle laws — Arrests — Bail bonds. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Any peace officer, including sheriffs and their deputies, constables and their deputies granted police powers, city police officers, county police or patrols, and special officers appointed by any agency of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for the enforcement of its laws relating to motor vehicles and boats or boating, now existing or hereafter enacted, shall be authorized and it is hereby made the duty of each of them to enforce the provisions of this chapter and to make arrests for any violation or violations thereof, and for violations of any other law relating to motor vehicles and boating, without warrant if the offense be committed in his or her presence, and with warrant or summons if he or she does not observe the commission of the offense. When in pursuit of any offender for any offense committed within his or her jurisdiction, any such officer may follow and effect an arrest beyond the limits of his or her jurisdiction. If the arrest be made without warrant, the accused may elect to be immediately taken before the nearest court having jurisdiction, whereupon it shall be the duty of the officer to so take him or her. If the accused elects not to be so taken, then it shall be the duty of the officer to require of the accused a bail-bond in a sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100), conditioned that the accused binds himself or herself to appear in the court of jurisdiction at the time fixed in the bond, not however in any case later than six (6) days from the day of arrest. In case the arrested person fails to appear on the day fixed, the bond shall be forfeited in the manner as is provided for the forfeiture of bonds in other cases. No officer shall be permitted to take a cash bond. The officer making the arrest and taking the bond shall report the same to the court having jurisdiction within eighteen (18) hours after taking such bond.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 40; 1974, ch. 305, § 1; 2019 ch. 44, § 23, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 90, § 24, effective January 1, 2023.

281.767.
Human trafficking hotline telephone number to be prominently displayed in each truck stop’s and bus station’s restrooms.

As used in this section:

“Truck stop” means a privately owned and operated facility that provides services, including but not limited to:

Food;

Fuel;

Showers or other sanitary facilities; and

Lawful overnight parking for motor carriers; and

“Bus station” means a fixed structure where a bus delivers and receives passengers that has a restroom.

Every truck stop and bus station shall post in all of its restrooms a printed sign in English and Spanish at least eleven (11) inches by fourteen (14) inches in size, with letters at least one (1) inch high, displaying the current telephone hotline number of the National Human Trafficking Resource Center or any federally funded successor entity. The sign shall be:

Created using gender-neutral language supplied by the Office of the Attorney General; and

Posted in a prominent place easily seen by patrons.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 75, § 5, effective July 15, 2020.

281.770.
Commissioning employees of Department of State Police as law enforcement officers. [Repealed,
reenacted and amended.]

281.771.
Charges against commissioned employees — Procedure — Hearing. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

281.772.
Trial board for hearings on charges against commissioned employees — Right to hearing — Appeals. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

281.773.
Appeal of trial board determination of guilt. [Repealed.]

281.775.
Investigations and inquiries.

The department may conduct any investigation, inquiry, or hearing that it may deem proper in connection with the performance of its duties under this chapter with respect to motor carriers. The investigation and inquiry may be conducted by or before the commissioner or any of his assistants or any representative of the department designated by the commissioner. Any hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS

281.640

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 42; 1996, ch. 318, § 206, effective July 15, 1996; 2015 ch. 19, § 25, effective June 24, 2015.

281.780.
Right of appeal — How taken. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 43; 1952, ch. 19, § 4; 1954, ch. 188, § 9; 1958, ch. 130, § 17; 1962, ch. 63, § 10; 1972, ch. 269, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1996, ch. 318, § 207, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.785.
Procedure on appeal — Powers of Circuit Court, judgment — Appeal to Court of Appeals. [Repealed.]

281.790.
Injunctions.

At the instance of the Department of Vehicle Regulation or of any person having an interest in the subject matter, the courts of this state may enjoin any person from violating any of the provisions of this chapter or other chapters relating to the operation or taxation of motor vehicles, or any order, rule, regulation or requirement of the department relating to such vehicles.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 45; 1962, ch. 96, § 5.

281.795.
Venue.

The Franklin Circuit Court shall hold concurrent venue with the courts of this Commonwealth of all civil and injunctive actions instituted by the department for the enforcement of this chapter and the orders, rules and regulations of the department thereunder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 46.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The venue provisions of this section apply to KRS

281.790

injunctions by DMT against overweight coal truck violations pursuant to KRS

189.221

and 189.222(1).

OAG 70-522

.

281.800.
Public attorneys to represent Department of Vehicle Regulation.

Upon the request of the Department of Vehicle Regulation, the Attorney General or any Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney shall represent the department within his jurisdiction and without additional compensation, in any action or proceeding in which the department is a party, arising under the provisions of this chapter relating to motor carriers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 63, § 47.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Attorney general, duties as to state litigation, KRS

15.020

.

State agencies may employ attorneys, KRS

12.210

.

281.801.
Application determined on basis of affidavits when no protest filed. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 269, § 6; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.802.
Advertising prohibited without certificate number and the name under which it is issued.

A carrier who is the holder of a certificate issued by this department shall not advertise under any name other than that in which its certificate is issued.

A person shall not advertise his or her services for the intrastate transportation of passengers or household goods without including in such advertisement the certificate number issued to him or her by the department.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 269, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1982, ch. 359, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2015 ch. 19, § 26, effective June 24, 2015.

281.804.
Operation of taxicab in competition with common carrier. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 284, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.

281.805.
Operation of taxicab in competition with common carrier. [Repealed.]

281.806.
Chapter not to be construed to prohibit department from granting certificate authorizing operation of taxicabs from unincorporated community. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 12, effective March 29, 1956; repealed by 2015 ch. 19, § 45, effective June 24, 2015.